Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2006
Recyclable, defined.

Recyclable shall mean suitable for any process of separating, cleaning, treating, and reconstituting waste or other discarded materials for the purpose of recovering or reusing the resources contained therein.

Laws 1989, LB 325, § 6.